Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.02.035

Referendum.

Upon the filing of a referendum petition in the manner provided in RCW 35A.29.170 signed by qualified electors of an incorporated city or town in number equal to not less than ten percent of the votes cast in the last general municipal election, such resolution shall be referred for approval or rejection by the voters at an election as specified in RCW 35A.02.025.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.02.035.]